fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à cordes: Accessoires pour guitares; Accessoires pour instruments à cordes d’orchestre; Entretien et nettoyage des instruments à cordes
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за струнни инструменти: Аксесоари за китара; Аксесоари за оркестрови струнни инструменти; Грижа и почистване на струнни инструменти
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 弦乐器配件: 吉他配件; 管弦乐器配件; 弦乐器清洁保养
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 弦樂器配件: 吉他配件; 管弦弦樂器配件; 弦樂器清潔保養品
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Jousisoitintarvikkeet: Kitaratarvikkeet; Orkestraaliset jousisoitin­tarvikkeet; Jousisoitinten puhdistus ja huolto
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Styginių instrumentų priedai: Gitarų priedai; Orkestrinių styginių instrumentų priedai; Styginių instrumentų priežiūra ir valymas
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องสาย: อุปกรณ์กีตาร์; อุปกรณ์เครื่องสายออร์เคสตรา; การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องสาย
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Smyčcové nástroje – příslušenství: Kytary – příslušenství; Příslušenství ke koncertním smyčcovým nástrojům; Údržba a čištění strunných nástrojů
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Telli Çalgı Aksesuarları: Gitar Aksesuarları; Telli Orkestra Enstrümanı Aksesuarları; Telli Çalgı Bakım ve Temizliği
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Strengeinstrumenter – tilbehør: Guitar – tilbehør; Tilbehør til strygeinstrumenter; Strenginstrumenter – pleje og rengøring
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za godala: Dodatki za kitare; Dodatki za orkestrska godala; Nega in čiščenje godal
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za gudačka glazbala: Pribor za gitare; Pribor za orkestralna žičana glazbala; Održavanje i čišćenje orkestralnih žičanih glazbala
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til strengeinstrumenter: Gitartilbehør; Tilbehør til orkesterstrengeinstrumenter; Pleie og rengjøring av strengeinstrumenter
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de corda: Acessórios para guitarra; Acessórios para instrumentos de corda para orquestras; Manutenção e limpeza de instrumentos de corda
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori strumenti a corda: Accessori per chitarra; Accessori per strumenti ad arco; Cura e pulitura strumenti a corda
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de cordas: Acessórios de guitarra; Acessórios de instrumento de cordas de orquestra; Limpeza e cuidado de instrumento de cordas
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện dành cho nhạc cụ dây: Phụ kiện guitar; Phụ kiện nhạc cụ dây trong dàn nhạc; Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc nhạc cụ dây
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor snaarinstrumenten: Accessoires voor gitaren; Accessoires voor strijkinstrumenten; Onderhoud en reiniging van snaarinstrumenten
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till stränginstrument: Gitarrtillbehör; Tillbehör till orkesterstränginstrument; Vård och rengöring av stränginstrument
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych: Akcesoria do gitar; Akcesoria do instrumentów strunowych dla orkiestr; Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do instrumentów strunowych
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde: Accesorii pentru chitară; Accesorii pentru instrumente cu coarde pentru orchestră; Îngrijirea și curățarea instrumentelor cu coarde
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda: Accesorios para guitarra; Accesorios para instrumentos de cuerda de orquesta; Limpieza y cuidado de instrumentos de cuerda
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 현악기 부대용품: 기타 부대용품; 오케스트라 현악기 부대용품; 현악기 관리/청소 용품
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 弦楽器用品: ギター用品; オーケストラ弦楽器関連用品; 弦楽器お手入れ用品
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Saiteninstrumente: Gitarrenzubehör; Zubehör für Streichinstrumente & Harfen; Saiteninstrumentenpflege &-reinigung
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для струнных инструментов: Аксессуары для гитар; Аксессуары для оркестровых струнных инструментов; Чистка струнных инструментов и уход за ними
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ εγχόρδων οργάνων: Αξεσουάρ κιθάρας; Αξεσουάρ ορχηστρικών εγχόρδων οργάνων; Φροντίδα & Καθαρισμός εγχόρδων οργάνων
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > String Instrument Accessories: Guitar Accessories; Orchestral String Instrument Accessories; String Instrument Care & Cleaning
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre sláčikové nástroje: Príslušenstvo pre gitaru; Príslušenstvo k orchestrálnym sláčikovým nástrojom; Starostlivosť a čistenie sláčikových nástrojov
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Vonóshangszer-kiegészítők: Gitárkiegészítők; Zenekarivonóshangszer-kiegészítők; Vonóshangszer-ápolás és -tisztítás